Utah statutes.
53A-1-204.   Gross neglect of duty -- Nonpayment of salary or expenses.

(1)  Failure of a member of the State Board of Education or of a governing board of a branch or division of the public school system to carry out responsibilities assigned by law or to comply with rules of the State Board of Education is gross neglect of duty.

(2)  Salary or expenses shall not be paid for work which violates rules of the board.



Enacted by Chapter 2, 1988 General Session

